Yamls-norm/V-nhika_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - nhika: # Verb pg 275 'eng eat, pt' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     nhika+V+ScSg1: nhinhika # I eat
     nhika+V+ScSg2: pynhika # you(sg) eat
     nhika+V+ScSg3M: inhika # he eats
     nhika+V+ScSg3F: unhika # she eats


     nhika+V+ScPl1: anhika # we eat
     nhika+V+ScPl2: hĩnhika # you(pl) eat
     nhika+V+ScPl3M: ynhikana # they eat
     nhika+V+ScPl3F: unhikana # they eat
